Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-159
Records retention; enforcement.

A telecommunications company shall:

(1) Keep accounts according to commission rules and regulations;

(2) File financial reports in a form and at times prescribed by the commission;

(3) File current price lists and service standards prescribed by the commission; and

(4) Cooperate with commission investigations of customer complaints.

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 58.